Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-162
Nebraska Forest Service; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska from the General Fund the money necessary to fund the core programs and services of the Nebraska Forest Service. Such appropriations shall be for the sole purpose of carrying out such programs.

Laws 2004, LB 917, § 2.